West Virginia, session 2026, HB4644.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §18-4-2. Qualifications; health certificate; disability; acting superintendent. (a) A county superintendent shall hold a professional administrative certificate endorsed for superintendent, or a first class permit endorsed for superintendent, subject to the following:(1) A superintendent who holds a first class permit may be appointed for one year only, and may be reappointed two times for an additional year each upon an annual evaluation by the county board and a determination of satisfactory performance and reasonable progress toward completion of the requirements for a professional administrative certificate endorsed for superintendent;(2) Any candidate for superintendent, assistant superintendent or associate superintendent, who possesses an earned doctorate from an accredited institution of higher education and either has completed three successful years of teaching in public education or has the equivalent of three years of experience in management or supervision as defined by state board rule, after employment by the county board shall be granted a permanent administrative certificate and shall be a licensed county superintendent;(3) The state board shall promulgate a legislative rule in accordance with §29A-3B-1 et seq. of this code, to address those cases where a county board finds that course work needed by the county superintendent who holds a first class permit is not available or is not scheduled at state institutions of higher education in a manner which will enable the county superintendent to complete normal requirements for a professional administrative certificate within the three-year period allowed under the permit; and(4) Any person employed as assistant superintendent or educational administrator prior to June 27, 1988, and who was previously employed as superintendent is not required to hold the professional administrative certificate endorsed for superintendent.(b) In addition to other requirements set forth in this section, a county superintendent shall meet the following health-related conditions of employment:(1) Before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, file with the president of the county board a certificate from a licensed physician certifying the following:(A) A tuberculin skin test, of the type Mantoux test (PPD skin test), approved by the Commissioner of the Bureau for Public Health has been made within four months prior to the beginning of the term of the county superintendent; and(B) The county superintendent does not have tuberculosis in a communicable state based upon the test results and any further study;(2) The commissioner may require selective testing of superintendents for tuberculosis when there is reason to believe that they may have been exposed to the tuberculosis organism or they have signs and symptoms indicative of the disease. The county superintendent should contact the local health department in instances where they have reason to suspect that they have been exposed to tuberculosis or have symptoms indicative of the disease. Positive reactors to the skin test are to be referred immediately to licensed health care practitioner for evaluation and indicated treatment or further studies;(3) A county superintendent who is certified by a licensed health care practitioner to have tuberculosis in a communicable stage shall have his or her employment discontinued or suspended until the disease has been arrested and is no longer communicable; and(4) A county superintendent who fails to complete required follow-up examinations as set forth in this subsection shall be suspended from employment until a report of examination is confirmed.(c) A county superintendent shall be a West Virginia resident.